West Virginia, session 2026, SB16.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State responsiblities for children. §49-2-802a. Information to be provided at the outset of a child protective services investigation Child Protection Investigations Reform Act. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, immediately upon initiating an investigation of a parent or other person having legal custody of a child, the department shall, upon first contact with the individual, provide the individual with a copy of A Parent’s Guide to Working with Child Protective Services (Guide).(b) The Guide shall include a short and plain statement to include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Steps that the department will take to investigate signs of abuse and neglect;(2) Steps that may need to be taken to make a safer or healthier home for the child;(3) An overview of the court process;(4) The confidentiality of maltreatment reports and case appeals;(5) Child visitation; and  (6) Case appeals.(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of code to the contrary, immediately upon initiating an investigation of a parent or other person having legal custody of a child, the department shall, upon first contact with the person, provide to the person:(1) A Summary that:(A) Is brief and easily understood;(B) Is written in a language that the person understands, or if the person is illiterate, is read to the person in a language that the person understands; and (C) Contains the following information:(i) The department's procedures for conducting an investigation of alleged child abuse or neglect, including: a description of the circumstances under which the department would request to remove the child from the home through the judicial system; and an explanation that the law requires the department to refer all reports of alleged child abuse or neglect to a law enforcement agency for a separate determination of whether a criminal violation occurred;(ii) The person's right to file a complaint with the department in the investigation;(iii) The person's right to review all records of the investigation unless the review would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation or the child's safety; (iv) The person's right to seek legal counsel;(v) References to the statutory and regulatory provisions governing child abuse and neglect and how the person may obtain copies of those provisions;(vi) The process the person may use to acquire access to the child if the child is removed from the home; and(vii) The rights listed under subdivision (2) of subsection (a):(2) A verbal notification made in a language that the person understands that the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution applies to the department, and protects the person, and that the person has the right to:(A) Exercise his or her right against self-incrimination and not speak with any agent of the department without legal counsel present; (B) Assistance by an attorney;(C) Have court-appointed attorney if the person is indigent;(D) Record any interaction or interview subject to disclosure to the department, law enforcement, or another party under a court order;(E) Refuse to allow the investigator to enter the home or interview the children without legal counsel present;(F) Withhold consent to the release of any medical or mental health records;(G) Withhold consent to any medical or psychological examination of the child;(H) Refuse to submit to a drug or urine test; and(I) Consult with legal counsel prior to agreeing to any proposed voluntary safety plan; and(3) A verbal or written summary made in a language that the person understands of the allegations against the person, and whether they were made by an anonymous reporter.(b) The department shall adopt a form for the purpose of verifying that the parent or other person having legal custody of the child received the verbal notification and written summary required by this section.(c) The changes in law made by this section apply only to an investigation of a report of child abuse or neglect that is made on or after the effective date of this section.  An investigation of a report of abuse or neglect made before the effective date of this section is governed by the law in effect on the date the report was made, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.(d) This section takes effect on July 1, 2026.